Utah statutes.
78B-7-206.   Statewide domestic violence network.

The Administrative Office of the Courts, in cooperation with the Department of Public Safety and the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division, shall post ex parte child protective orders, child protective orders, and any modifications to them on the statewide network established in Section 78B-7-113.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

